Idaho, session 2026, H0765.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 31-1411, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
31-1411. ANNEXATION OF TERRITORY IN SAME COUNTY -- PETITION -- HEAR-
ING -- ORDER -- CERTIFICATION TO COUNTY COMMISSIONERS -- ALTERNATE PROCEDURE
-- ELECTION -- PETITION TO DE-ANNEX PROPERTY FROM EXISTING DISTRICT AND AN-
NEX INTO ANOTHER DISTRICT. (1) After the organization of a fire protection
district, additional contiguous or noncontiguous territory lying within the
same county may be added thereto and shall thereupon and thenceforth be in-
cluded in such district. Territory that is not contained in an existing fire
district, and is not immediately adjoining the boundaries of the fire dis-
trict into which annexation is sought, may be annexed into the district pro-
vided the territory consists of not less than forty (40) contiguous acres.
At least seventy-five percent (75%) or more of the owners or contract pur-
chasers of the land sought to be annexed shall petition the fire protection
board and request annexation of the territory particularly described in said
the petition. Upon receipt of any such a petition to annex, the fire protec-
tion board shall hold a hearing not less than ten (10) nor more than thirty
(30) days thereafter, or, upon the written consent of the petitioner, within
one hundred eighty (180) days, and said the board shall cause notice of such
the hearing, designating the time and place, to be published in at least one
(1) issue of a newspaper of general circulation within the district. Any
person supporting or objecting to such the petition shall be heard at such
the hearing, if in attendance, and at the close of such the hearing said,
the board shall approve or reject said the petition. If the board approves
said the petition, it shall make an order to that effect and certify a copy of
said the order containing an accurate legal description of the annexed ter-
ritory to the board of county commissioners of the county where said the fire
district is situated. Said The board of county commissioners shall there-
upon enter an order of annexation and cause the same to be recorded so as to
include the annexed property on the tax rolls as provided in this chapter
provided.


(2) In the event that more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the owners
or contract purchasers of the land sought to be annexed do not join in said
the petition, and the board determines by resolution, entered on the min-
utes of the board, that the annexation would be in the best interests of the
district and that an election on the issue should be held, additional terri-
tory may nevertheless be annexed by the affirmative vote of a majority of the
qualified electors of such the additional territory voting on the question
at an election held therefor, which vote may be taken at an election held as
provided in section 31-1405, Idaho Code. The same procedure shall be adopted
as provided in sections 31-1402 through 31-1406, Idaho Code.
(3) Any area embraced within the limits of any fire protection district
may be de-annexed by such fire protection district and annexed into another
fire protection district:
(a) If owners or contract purchasers of territory located within an
existing fire protection district seek to petition to be annexed into
another fire protection district, they must demonstrate that they are
likely to receive an improved response to requests for services from
the other fire protection district, and obtain written approval of the
board of the fire protection district within which the territory is al-
ready located. The written approval must be attached to their petition
to annex. The procedure for the annexation petition shall be the same as
otherwise provided in this section. Upon receipt of a petition to an-
nex, the fire protection board shall hold a hearing no less than ten (10)
nor more than thirty (30) days thereafter or, upon the written consent
of the petitioner, within one hundred eighty (180) days, and the board
shall cause notice of such hearing, designating the time and place, to
be published in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper of general circu-
lation within the district. Any person supporting or objecting to the
petition shall be heard at the hearing, if in attendance, and at the
close of the hearing, the board shall approve or reject the petition. If
the board approves the petition, it shall make an order to that effect
and certify a copy of the order containing an accurate legal descrip-
tion of the annexed territory to the board of county commissioners of
the county where the fire district is situated and to the state tax com-
mission pursuant to section 63-215, Idaho Code. The board of county
commissioners shall thereupon enter an order of annexation and cause
the same to be recorded so as to include the annexed property on the tax
rolls as provided in this chapter; or
(b) With the consent of the governing boards of each fire protection
district, expressed by ordinance or resolution of each district. If the
boards approve any annexation and corresponding de-annexation of ter-
ritory, the fire protection district annexing territory shall make an
order to that effect and certify a copy of the order containing an accu-
rate legal description of the annexed territory to the board of county
commissioners of the county where the fire district is situated and to
the state tax commission pursuant to section 63-215, Idaho Code. The
board of county commissioners shall thereupon enter an order of annexa-
tion and cause the same to be recorded so as to include the annexed prop-
erty on the tax rolls as provided in this chapter.


SECTION 2. That Section 63-301A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-301A. NEW CONSTRUCTION ROLL. (1) The county assessor shall prepare
a new construction roll, which shall be in addition to the property roll,
which new construction roll shall show:
(a) The name of the taxpayer;
(b) The description of the new construction, suitably detailed to meet
the requirements of the individual county;
(c) The amount of taxable market value added to the property on the cur-
rent year's property roll that is directly the result of new construc-
tion;
(d) The amount of taxable market value added as provided in subsection
(3)(f) of this section as a result of dissolution of any revenue alloca-
tion area; and
(e) The amount of taxable market value to be deducted to reflect the ad-
justments required in this paragraph:
(i) Any board of tax appeals or court-ordered value change, if
property has a taxable value lower than that shown on any new con-
struction roll in any one (1) of the immediate five (5) tax years
preceding the current tax year;
(ii) Any reduction in value resulting from correction of value im-
properly included on any previous new construction roll as a re-
sult of double or otherwise erroneous assessment;
(iii) Any reduction in value resulting from the exemption provided
in section 63-602W(4), Idaho Code, in any one (1) of the immediate
five (5) tax years preceding the current tax year; and
(iv) Any voluntary reduction in value reflecting a portion of
certain homestead exemptions as provided in section 63-602G(10),
Idaho Code.; and
(v) Any reduction in value resulting from a fire protection dis-
trict de-annexing territory pursuant to section 31-1411(3), Idaho
Code, or library district de-annexing territory pursuant to sec-
tion 33-2711A, Idaho Code. The full taxable market value for as-
sessment purposes of such de-annexed territory, as certified by
the county assessor, shall be deducted from the new construction
roll for the de-annexing district in the year following the de-an-
nexation.
(2) As soon as possible, but in any event by no later than the first Mon-
day in June, the new construction roll shall be certified to the county audi-
tor and a listing showing the amount of value on the new construction roll in
each taxing district or unit shall be forwarded to the state tax commission
on or before the fourth Monday in July. Provided however, the value shown
in subsection (3)(e) of this section shall be reported to the appropriate
county auditor by the state tax commission by the third Monday in July and the
value sent by the county auditor to each taxing district. The value estab-
lished pursuant to subsection (3)(e) of this section is subject to correc-
tion by the state tax commission until the first Monday in September, and any
such corrections shall be sent to the appropriate county auditor, who shall
notify any affected taxing districts.


(3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the value shown on
the new construction roll shall include ninety percent (90%) of the taxable
market value increase from:
(a) Construction of any new structure that previously did not exist,
once it is completed and taxable;
(b) Additions or alterations to existing nonresidential structures;
(c) Installation of new or used manufactured housing that did not pre-
viously exist within the county;
(d) Property newly taxable as a result of loss of the exemption provided
by section 63-602W(3) or (4), Idaho Code;
(e) The construction of any improvement or installation of any equip-
ment used for or in conjunction with the generation of electricity and
the addition of any improvement or equipment intended to be so used, ex-
cept property that has a value allocated or apportioned pursuant to sec-
tion 63-405, Idaho Code, or that is owned by a cooperative or municipal-
ity as those terms are defined in section 61-332A, Idaho Code, or that
is owned by a public utility as that term is defined in section 61-332A,
Idaho Code, owning any other property that is allocated or apportioned.
No replacement equipment or improvements may be included;
(f) Provided such increases do not include increases already reported
on the new construction roll as permitted in paragraphs (i) and (j) of
this subsection, increases in value over the base value of property
on the base assessment roll within an urban renewal revenue alloca-
tion area that has been terminated pursuant to section 50-2914, Idaho
Code, to the extent that this increment exceeds the incremental value
as of December 31, 2006, or, for revenue allocation areas formed af-
ter December 31, 2006, eighty percent (80%) of the increment value.
Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the new construction
roll shall not include new construction located within an urban renewal
district's revenue allocation area, except as provided in this para-
graph or paragraph (k) of this subsection;
(g) New construction, in any one (1) of the immediate five (5) tax years
preceding the current tax year, allowable but never included on a new
construction roll, provided however, that for such property the value
on the new construction roll shall reflect the taxable value that would
have been included on the new construction roll for the first year in
which the property should have been included;
(h) Formerly exempt improvements on state college-owned or state uni-
versity-owned land for student dining, housing, or other education-re-
lated purposes approved by the state board of education and board of
regents of the university of Idaho as proper for the operation of such
state college or university, provided such improvements were never in-
cluded on any previous new construction roll;
(i) Increases in base value when due to previously determined incre-
ment value added to the base value as required in sections 50-2903 and
50-2903A, Idaho Code, due to a modification of the urban renewal plan.
In this case, the amount added to the new construction roll will equal
eighty percent (80%) of the amount by which the increment value in the
year immediately preceding the year in which the base value adjustment
described in this subsection occurs exceeds the incremental value as of


December 31, 2006, or, for revenue allocation areas formed after Decem-
ber 31, 2006, the entire increment value; and
(j) Increases in base value when due to previously determined incre-
ment value added to the base value as a result of a de-annexation within
a revenue allocation area as defined in section 50-2903, Idaho Code.
In this case, the amount added to the new construction roll will equal
eighty percent (80%) of the amount by which the increment value in the
year immediately preceding the year in which the de-annexation de-
scribed in this subsection occurs exceeds the incremental value as of
December 31, 2006, or, for revenue allocation areas formed after Decem-
ber 31, 2006, the entire increment value within the area subject to the
de-annexation.
(k) In the case of a fire protection district or ambulance service
district that encompasses all or part of any urban renewal revenue
allocation area that such district withdrew from pursuant to section
50-2906(5), Idaho Code, eighty percent (80%) of the increment value may
be included on the new construction roll for the year in which the dis-
trict withdrew from such urban renewal revenue allocation area. Each
year thereafter, ninety percent (90%) of the taxable value of otherwise
qualifying new construction shall be included in the new construction
roll for such fire protection district or ambulance service district,
even if such new construction would not otherwise qualify because it was
located within a revenue allocation area.
(4) The amount of taxable market value of new construction shall be the
change in net taxable market value that is attributable directly to the new
construction or loss of the exemption provided by section 63-602W(3) or (4),
Idaho Code. It shall not include any change in value of existing property
that is due to external market forces such as general or localized inflation,
except as provided in subsection (3)(f) of this section.
(5) The amount of taxable market value of new construction shall not in-
clude any new construction of property that has been granted a provisional
property tax exemption, pursuant to section 63-1305C, Idaho Code. A prop-
erty owner may apply to the board of county commissioners, if an application
is required pursuant to section 63-602, Idaho Code, for an exemption from
property tax at the time the initial building permits are applied for or at
the time construction of the property has begun, whichever is earlier, or at
any time thereafter.
(6) The amount of taxable market value of new construction shall not in-
clude any new construction of property for which an exemption from sales and
use tax has been granted pursuant to section 63-3622VV, Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-802. LIMITATION ON BUDGET REQUESTS -- LIMITATION ON TAX CHARGES --
EXCEPTIONS. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no taxing dis-
trict shall certify a budget request for an amount of property tax revenues
to finance an annual budget that exceeds the maximum sum permitted under this
section:
(a)(i) The highest dollar amount of property taxes certified for
its annual budget for any one (1) of the three (3) tax years preced-


ing the current tax year, which amount may be increased by a growth
factor of not to exceed three percent (3%) plus the amount of rev-
enue calculated as described in this subsection. The taxing dis-
trict shall determine what portion of the three percent (3%) in-
crease permitted under this subparagraph that it requires and then
calculate a preliminary levy rate based on the percent chosen. In
calculating the preliminary levy rate, the most current taxable
market value shall be used, except that for taxable market values
of centrally assessed operating property, the prior year's valua-
tion may be used instead of the current year's taxable market val-
ues. The preliminary levy rate shall be multiplied by the value
shown on the new construction roll compiled pursuant to section
63-301A, Idaho Code, and by ninety percent (90%) of the value of
annexation during the previous calendar year, as certified by the
state tax commission for taxable market values of operating prop-
erty of public utilities and by the county assessor; except for a
fire protection district annexing property prior to July 1, 2021,
pursuant to section 31-1429, Idaho Code, the new levy rate shall be
multiplied by one hundred percent (100%) of the value of any such
property annexed prior to July 1, 2021.
(ii) The total budget increase calculated under this paragraph
must not exceed eight percent (8%), except that any increase in the
amount of property tax revenue to finance an annual budget added as
a result of the following shall not be subject to such limitation:
1. The termination, de-annexation, plan modification of,
or the withdrawal of certain taxing districts from, a rev-
enue allocation area of an urban renewal district pursuant
to section 63-301A(3)(f), (i), (j), or (k), Idaho Code, or
section 50-2908(1)(g), Idaho Code, shall not be subject to
such limitation;
2. A fire protection district annexing territory pursuant
to section 31-1411(3) or 31-1429, Idaho Code; or
3. A library district annexing territory of another library
district pursuant to section 33-2711A, Idaho Code.
(iii) Following the first year in which a fire protection district
has annexed city property pursuant to section 31-1429, Idaho Code,
the city shall subtract an amount equal to the moneys spent on fire
protection services during the last full year the city provided
fire protection services to its residents from its budget limita-
tion under this section.
(b) If the taxing district has not imposed a levy for three (3) or more
years, the highest dollar amount of property taxes certified for its an-
nual budget for the purpose of paragraph (a)(i) of this subsection shall
be the dollar amount of property taxes certified for its annual budget
during the last year in which a levy was made.
(c) The dollar amount of the actual budget request may be substituted
for the amount in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the taxing dis-
trict is newly created, except as may be provided in paragraph (i) of
this subsection.


(d) This section does not apply to school district levies imposed in
section 33-802, Idaho Code.
(e)(i) In the case of a nonschool district for which less than the
maximum allowable increase in the dollar amount of property taxes
is certified for annual budget purposes in any one (1) year, such a
district may, in any following year, recover the forgone increase
by certifying, in addition to any increase otherwise allowed, any
or all of the increase originally forgone. Provided however, that
prior to budgeting any forgone increase, the district must provide
notice of its intent to do so, hold a public hearing that may be in
conjunction with its annual budget hearing, and certify by resolu-
tion the amount of forgone increase to be budgeted and the specific
purpose for which the forgone increase is being budgeted. Upon
adoption of the resolution, the clerk of the district shall file a
copy of the resolution with the county clerk and the state tax com-
mission. Said additional amount shall be included in future cal-
culations for increases as allowed, except as provided in subpara-
graph (iii) of this paragraph.
(ii) If the forgone increase is budgeted for the purpose of main-
tenance and operations, the rate of recovering the reserved for-
gone moneys may increase the taxing district's budget by no more
than one percent (1%) per year.
(iii) If the forgone increase is budgeted for a capital project or
projects, the rate of recovering the reserved forgone moneys may
not exceed three percent (3%) of the taxing district's budget for
the year in which the forgone increase is budgeted. Forgone moneys
budgeted for a capital project must be deducted from the taxing
district's forgone balance in the year in which it is budgeted.
Upon completion of such a capital project, the taxing district
shall certify such completion to the state tax commission and
county clerk. If, upon certification, the state tax commission
finds that the taxing district included forgone moneys for a capi-
tal project in calculating the increase permitted under paragraph
(a) of this subsection, the state tax commission shall direct the
taxing district to reduce its property tax budget for any year
in which the forgone moneys were used to calculate a budget in-
crease, in an amount equal to the forgone moneys budgeted plus any
increases attributed to the forgone moneys improperly included in
the taxing district's property tax budget. For the purpose of this
paragraph, a capital project includes:
1. The construction, expansion, renovation, or replacement
of public facilities, including the acquisition of land and
other site improvements;
2. The construction, expansion, or reconstruction of public
works improvements, including roads, bridges, water sys-
tems, sewer systems, and broadband systems; and
3. The purchase of equipment with a useful life of ten (10)
years or more.
(f) If a taxing district elects to budget less than the maximum allow-
able increase in the dollar amount of property taxes, the taxing dis-


trict may reserve the right to recover all or any portion of that year's
forgone increase in a subsequent year by adoption of a resolution spec-
ifying the dollar amount of property taxes being reserved. Otherwise,
that year's forgone increase may not be recovered under paragraph (e) of
this subsection. The district must provide notice of its intent to do so
and hold a public hearing that may be in conjunction with its annual bud-
get hearing, if applicable. The resolution to reserve the right to re-
cover the forgone increase for that year shall be adopted at the annual
budget hearing of the taxing district if the district has a budget hear-
ing requirement.
(g) In the case of cities, if the immediately preceding year's levy sub-
ject to the limitation provided by this section is less than 0.004, the
city may increase its budget by an amount not to exceed the difference
between 0.004 and the actual prior year's levy multiplied by the prior
year's market value for assessment purposes. The additional amount
must be approved by sixty percent (60%) of the voters voting on the ques-
tion at an election called for that purpose and held on the date in May or
November provided by law and may be included in the annual budget of the
city for purposes of this section.
(h) A taxing district may submit to the electors within the district
the question of whether the budget from property tax revenues may be
increased beyond the amount authorized in this section, but not beyond
the levy authorized by statute. The additional amount must be approved
by sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%) or more of the voters
voting on the question at an election called for that purpose and held
on the May or November dates provided by section 34-106, Idaho Code.
If approved by the required minimum sixty-six and two-thirds percent
(66 2/3%) of the voters voting at the election, the new budget amount
shall be the base budget for the purposes of this section.
(i) When a nonschool district consolidates with another nonschool
district or dissolves and a new district performing similar governmen-
tal functions as the dissolved district forms with the same boundaries
within three (3) years, the maximum amount of a budget of the district
from property tax revenues shall not be greater than the sum of the
amounts that would have been authorized by this section for the district
itself or for the districts that were consolidated or dissolved and in-
corporated into a new district.
(j) This section does not apply to cooperative service agency levies
imposed in sections 33-317 and 33-317A, Idaho Code.
(k) The amount of money received in the twelve (12) months immediately
preceding June 30 of the current tax year as a result of distributions of
the tax provided in section 63-3502B(2), Idaho Code.
(2) In the case of fire districts, during the year immediately follow-
ing the election of a public utility or public utilities to consent to be pro-
vided fire protection pursuant to section 31-1425, Idaho Code, the maximum
amount of property tax revenues permitted in subsection (1) of this section
may be increased by an amount equal to the current year's taxable value of the
consenting public utility or public utilities multiplied by that portion of
the prior year's levy subject to the limitation provided by subsection (1) of
this section.


(3) No board of county commissioners shall set a levy, nor shall the
state tax commission approve a levy for annual budget purposes, which ex-
ceeds the limitation imposed in subsection (1) of this section unless au-
thority to exceed such limitation has been approved by a majority of the tax-
ing district's electors voting on the question at an election called for that
purpose and held pursuant to section 34-106, Idaho Code, provided however,
that such voter approval shall be for a period of not to exceed two (2) years.
(4) The amount of property tax revenues to finance an annual budget does
not include revenues from nonproperty tax sources and does not include rev-
enue from levies for the payment of judicially confirmed obligations pur-
suant to sections 63-1315 and 63-1316, Idaho Code, and revenue from levies
that are voter-approved for bonds, override levies or supplemental levies,
plant facilities reserve fund levies, school emergency fund levies, or for
levies applicable to newly annexed property or for levies applicable to new
construction as evidenced by the value of property subject to the occupancy
tax pursuant to section 63-317, Idaho Code, for the preceding tax year. The
amount of property tax revenues to finance an annual budget does not include
any property taxes that were collected and refunded on property that is ex-
empt from taxation, pursuant to section 63-1305C, Idaho Code.
(5) The amount of property tax revenues to finance an annual budget
shall include moneys received as recovery of property tax for a revoked pro-
visional property tax exemption under section 63-1305C, Idaho Code.
(6) For tax year 2023, before calculating the amount required in sub-
section (1)(a)(i) of this section, the board of county commissioners shall
reduce the approved property tax levy portion of its budget for the immedi-
ate prior three (3) years in an amount equal to the amount levied for indigent
public defense. The reduced budget amount shall be the base budget for the
purpose of subsection (1)(a)(i) of this section.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2026.